California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(D) If the court finds at any hearing that the child, if the child consented to admission pursuant to Section 6552, continues to give voluntary consent to admission, that the child continues to suffer from a mental disorder which may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the facility, and that there continues to be no other available less restrictive hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service which might better serve the
 child’s medical need and best interest, the court may authorize the child’s continued consent to admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility. If the child has been in the facility for over 30 days, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the facility is not the least restrictive alternative to serve the child’s medical need and best interest.

(E) (i) If the court finds that the child, if the child consented to admission pursuant to Section 6552, no longer gives voluntary consent, that the child no longer suffers from a mental disorder which may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the facility, or that there is another available hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service which might better serve the child’s medical need and best interest, the social worker shall work immediately with the facility for discharge to a different
 setting with the appropriate and necessary services and supports in place. A statement from the child’s attorney that the child no longer gives voluntary consent to the admission to the facility may be sufficient to support a finding that the child no longer gives voluntary consent. The court shall set a hearing no later than 30 days to verify that the child has been discharged. If the child has not been discharged by the time of the hearing, the court shall issue any and all orders to effectuate the child’s immediate discharge, including exercising its powers under subdivision (b) of Section 362. This paragraph does not preclude involuntary detention of the child pursuant to the applicable requirements of the Children’s Civil Commitment and Mental Health Treatment Act of 1988 or the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act if the child withdraws voluntary consent. This paragraph does not preclude a parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or child’s social worker or attorney from arranging the child’s discharge from the
 facility without a court order.

(ii) If the court’s determination under clause (i) includes a determination that the child should receive treatment through another hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service, the court shall hold a hearing no later than 60 days from the child’s discharge to ensure that the other services have been provided.

(F) If the court determines the psychiatric residential treatment facility, which is licensed pursuant to Section 4081, failed to meet its legal obligation to provide services to the child, it may direct the social worker to engage with the facility to ensure the child is receiving all necessary services. If necessary, the court may exercise its powers under subdivision (b) of Section 362.

(G) The court may make any orders necessary to ensure that the
 child welfare agency makes all necessary arrangements for the child’s discharge promptly and that all services and supports are in place for the child’s successful transition to a different setting. The court may direct the social worker to work with the facility on the child’s aftercare plans as appropriate based on the child’s progress.

(H) This paragraph does not prevent the court from holding review hearings more frequently at its discretion.

(2) (A) No later than 60 days following the admission of a nonminor dependent to a psychiatric residential treatment facility, and every 30 days thereafter, the court shall hold a review hearing on the child or nonminor dependent’s placement in the facility based upon the medical necessity of that placement.

(B) If the hearing described in subparagraph
 (A) coincides with the date for a review hearing for a nonminor dependent pursuant to Section 366.31, the court may hold the hearing simultaneously with the status review hearing.

(C) At the hearing in subparagraph (A), the court shall consider all of the following:

(i) Whether the nonminor dependent continues to consent to the voluntary admission made pursuant to this section.

(ii) Whether the nonminor dependent’s receipt of treatment in the psychiatric residential treatment facility is medically necessary.

(iii) Whether there is any less restrictive alternative to meet the nonminor dependent’s needs, including a less restrictive facility or home or community-based mental health services.

(iv) Whether the psychiatric residential treatment facility, which is licensed pursuant to Section 4081, continues to meet its legal obligation to provide services to the nonminor dependent.

(v) The county child welfare agency’s plan as described in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10, and the agency’s actions to implement that plan.

(D) If the court finds at any review hearing that the nonminor dependent continues to voluntarily consent to admission and that the evidence supports the nonminor dependent’s need for care and treatment in the psychiatric residential treatment facility, the court shall enter these findings in the record and direct the social worker to transmit them to the facility or interdisciplinary team. The court may direct the social worker to work with the facility on the nonminor dependent’s aftercare plan as appropriate based on the
 nonminor dependent’s need to achieve independence.

(E) (i) If the court finds that the nonminor dependent no longer voluntarily consents to admission, the social worker shall notify the facility and immediately work with the nonminor dependent and the facility for discharge to a less restrictive setting with the appropriate and necessary services and supports in place. A statement from the nonminor dependent’s attorney that the nonminor dependent no longer gives voluntary consent to the admission to the facility is be sufficient to support a finding that the nonminor dependent no longer gives voluntary consent. The court shall set a hearing no later than 30 days to verify that the nonminor dependent has been discharged. If the nonminor dependent has not been discharged by the time of the hearing, the court shall issue any and all orders to effectuate the nonminor dependent’s immediate discharge, including exercising its
 powers under subdivision (b) of Section 362. This paragraph does not preclude involuntary detention of the nonminor dependent pursuant to the requirements of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act if the nonminor dependent withdraws voluntary consent. This paragraph does not preclude the nonminor dependent from arranging their own discharge from the facility without a court order.

(ii) If the court’s determination under clause (i) includes a determination that the nonminor dependent should receive treatment through another hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service, the court shall hold a hearing no later than 60 days from the nonminor dependent’s discharge to ensure that the other services have been provided.

(F) If the court determines the psychiatric residential treatment facility, which is licensed pursuant to Section 4081, failed to meet its legal
 obligation to provide services to the nonminor dependent, it may direct the social worker to engage with the facility to ensure the nonminor dependent is receiving all necessary services. If necessary, the court may exercise its powers under subdivision (b) of Section 362.

(G) The court may make any orders necessary to ensure that the child welfare agency makes all necessary arrangements for the nonminor dependent’s discharge promptly and that all services and supports are in place for the child’s successful transition to a different setting. The court may direct the social worker to work with the facility on the nonminor dependent’s aftercare plans as appropriate based on the nonminor dependent’s progress.

(H) This paragraph does not prevent the court from holding review hearings more frequently at its discretion.

(g) Whenever a child or nonminor dependent is discharged due to revocation of consent to admission, the county child welfare agency shall, within two court days of being notified of the revocation of consent, file a petition pursuant to Section 388 requesting an order vacating the court’s authorization of the child’s or nonminor dependent’s admission to the facility. This subdivision does not require a court order for the discharge of a child arranged for by the child’s social worker or attorney or nonminor dependent when consent to admission has been withdrawn.

(h) At any review hearing pursuant to Section 364, 366.21, 366.22, 366.3, or 366.31, if a child or nonminor dependent has been admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility pursuant to the consent of a conservator, the court shall review the child welfare agency’s plan developed pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10. The court may make any
 orders necessary to ensure that the child welfare agency promptly makes all necessary arrangements to ensure that the child or nonminor dependent is discharged in a timely manner and with all services and supports in place as necessary for a successful transition to a less restrictive setting. The court may direct the social worker to work with the facility and, where appropriate, the child’s or nonminor dependent’s court-appointed conservator, to ensure the child or nonminor dependent is receiving all necessary child welfare services and to develop the child’s or nonminor dependent’s aftercare plan as appropriate based on the evidence of the child’s or nonminor dependent’s progress.

(i) The documentation required by this section shall not contain information that is privileged or confidential under existing state or federal law or regulation without the appropriate waiver or consent.

(j) For purposes of this section, a “psychiatric residential treatment facility” refers to a psychiatric residential treatment facility defined in Section 1250.10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) All provisions in this section that apply to nonminor dependents shall apply equally to foster children who remain under juvenile court jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 303 after reaching the age of majority even if they do not meet the definition of “nonminor dependent” contained in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 589, Sec. 6.   (AB 2317)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

361.3.

(a) In any case in which a child is removed from the physical custody of their parents pursuant to Section 361, preferential consideration shall be given to a request by a relative of the child for placement of the child with the relative, regardless of the relative’s immigration status. In determining whether placement with a relative is appropriate, the county social worker and court shall consider, but shall not be limited to, consideration of all the following factors:

(1) The best interest of the child, including special physical, psychological, educational, medical, or emotional needs.

(2) The wishes of the parent, the
 relative, and child, if appropriate.

(3) The provisions of Part 6 (commencing with Section 7950) of Division 12 of the Family Code regarding relative placement.

(4) Placement of siblings and half siblings in the same home, unless that placement is found to be contrary to the safety and well-being of any of the siblings, as provided in Section 16002.

(5) The good moral character of the relative and any other adult living in the home, including whether any individual residing in the home has a prior history of violent criminal acts or has been responsible for acts of child abuse or neglect.

(6) The nature and duration of the relationship between the child
 and the relative, and the relative’s desire to care for, and to provide legal permanency for, the child if reunification is unsuccessful.

(7) The ability of the relative to do the following:

(A) Provide a safe, secure, and stable environment for the child.

(B) Exercise proper and effective care and control of the child.

(C) Provide a home and the necessities of life for the child.

(D) Protect the child from their parents.

(E) Facilitate court-ordered reunification efforts with the parents.

(F) Facilitate visitation with the child’s other relatives.

(G) Facilitate implementation of all elements of the case plan.

(H) (i) Provide legal permanence for the child if reunification fails.

(ii) However, any finding made with respect to the factor considered pursuant to this subparagraph and pursuant to subparagraph (G) shall not be the sole basis for precluding preferential placement with a relative.

(I) Arrange for appropriate and safe childcare, as
 necessary.

(8) (A) The safety of the relative’s home. For a relative to be considered appropriate to receive placement of a child under this section on an emergency basis, the relative’s home shall first be assessed pursuant to the process and standards described in Section 361.4.

(B) In this regard, the Legislature declares that a physical disability, such as blindness or deafness, is no bar to the raising of children, and a county social worker’s determination as to the ability of a disabled relative to exercise care and control should center upon whether the relative’s disability prevents them from exercising care and control. The court shall order the parent to disclose to the county social worker the names,
 residences, and any other known identifying information of any maternal or paternal relatives of the child. This inquiry shall not be construed, however, to guarantee that the child will be placed with any person so identified. The county social worker shall initially contact the relatives given preferential consideration for placement to determine if they desire the child to be placed with them. Those desiring placement shall be assessed according to the factors enumerated in this subdivision. The county social worker shall document these efforts in the social study prepared pursuant to Section 358.1. The court shall authorize the county social worker, while assessing these relatives for the possibility of placement, to disclose to the relative, as appropriate, the fact that the child is in custody, the alleged reasons for the custody, and the projected likely date for the child’s
 return home or placement for adoption or legal guardianship. However, this investigation shall not be construed as good cause for continuance of the dispositional hearing conducted pursuant to Section 358.

(b) In any case in which more than one relative requests preferential consideration pursuant to this section, each relative shall be considered under the factors enumerated in subdivision (a). Consistent with the legislative intent for children to be placed immediately with a relative, this section does not limit the county social worker’s ability to place a child in the home of a relative or a nonrelative extended family member pending the consideration of other relatives who have requested preferential consideration.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Preferential consideration” means that the relative seeking placement shall be the first placement to be considered and investigated.

(2) “Relative” means an adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship, including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,” or “grand,” or the spouse of any of these persons even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution.

(d) Subsequent to the hearing conducted pursuant to Section 358, whenever a new placement of the child must be made, consideration for placement shall again be given as described in this section to relatives who have not been found to
 be unsuitable and who will fulfill the child’s reunification or permanent plan requirements. In addition to the factors described in subdivision (a), the county social worker shall consider whether the relative has established and maintained a relationship with the child.

(e) If the court does not place the child with a relative who has been considered for placement pursuant to this section, the court shall state for the record the reasons placement with that relative was denied.

(f) (1) With respect to a child who satisfies the criteria set forth in paragraph (2), the department and any licensed adoption agency may search for a relative and furnish identifying information relating to the child to that relative if it is believed the child’s welfare
 will be promoted thereby.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The child was previously a dependent of the court.

(B) The child was previously adopted and the adoption has been disrupted, set aside pursuant to Section 9100 or 9102 of the Family Code, or the child has been released into the custody of the department or a licensed adoption agency by the adoptive parent or parents.

(3) As used in this subdivision, “relative” includes a member of the child’s birth family and nonrelative extended family members, regardless of whether the parental rights were terminated, provided that both of the following are true:

(A) No appropriate potential caretaker is known to exist from the child’s adoptive family, including nonrelative extended family members of the adoptive family.

(B) The child was not the subject of a voluntary relinquishment by the birth parents pursuant to Section 8700 of the Family Code or Section 1255.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) Placement of an Indian child shall comply with the placement preferences set forth in Section 361.31.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 16.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

361.31.

(a) If an Indian child is removed from the physical custody of their parents or Indian custodian pursuant to Section 361, the child’s placement shall comply with this section. The placement shall be analyzed each time there is a change in placement.

(b) Any foster care or guardianship placement of an Indian child, or any emergency removal of a child who is known to be, or if there is reason to know that the child is, an Indian child shall be in the least restrictive setting that most approximates a family situation and in which the child’s special needs, if any, may be met. The child shall also be placed within reasonable proximity to the child’s home, taking into account any special needs of the child. Preference shall be given to the child’s placement with one of
 the following, in descending priority order:

(1) A member of the child’s extended family, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 224.1 and Section 1903 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(2) A foster home licensed, approved, or specified by the child’s Indian tribe.

(3) An Indian foster home licensed or approved by an authorized non-Indian licensing authority.

(4) An institution for children approved by an Indian tribe or operated by an Indian organization that has a program suitable to meet the Indian child’s needs.

(c) In any adoptive placement of an Indian child, preference shall be given to a placement with one of the following, in
 descending priority order:

(1) A member of the child’s extended family, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 224.1 and Section 1903 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(2) Other members or citizens of the child’s Indian tribe.

(3) Another Indian family.

(d) Notwithstanding the placement preferences listed in subdivisions (b) and (c), if a different order of placement preference is established by the child’s Indian tribe, the court shall give full faith and credit to the preference established by the tribe, as they would to the laws of another state under the United States Constitution, and the agency effecting the placement shall follow that order of preference, so long as the placement is the least
 restrictive setting appropriate to the particular needs of the child as provided in subdivision (b).

(e) Where appropriate, the placement preference of the Indian child, if of sufficient age, or parent shall be considered. In applying the preferences, a consenting parent’s request for anonymity shall also be given weight by the court or agency effecting the placement.

(f) The prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian community in which the parent or extended family members of an Indian child reside, or with which the parent or extended family members maintain social and cultural ties, or the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe shall be applied in meeting the placement preferences under this section. A determination of the applicable prevailing social and cultural standards may be confirmed by the Indian child’s tribe or by the
 testimony or other documented support of a qualified expert witness, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 224.6, who is knowledgeable regarding the social and cultural standards of the Indian community.

(g) Any person, county welfare agency, or probation department involved in the placement of an Indian child shall conduct a diligent search for placements that meet the placement preferences and use the services of the Indian child’s tribe, whenever available through the tribe, in seeking to secure placement within the order of placement preference established in this section and in the supervision of the placement. The responsibility for seeking a placement consistent with subdivision (b), (c), and (d) shall remain with the person, county welfare agency, or probation department seeking the placement.

(h) If a party asserts that good cause not to follow the placement
 preferences exists, the reason for that assertion shall be stated orally on the record or provided in writing to the parties to the Indian child custody proceeding and the court.

(i) The party seeking departure from the placement preferences shall bear the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that there is good cause to depart from the placement preferences.

(j) A state court’s determination of good cause to depart from the placement preferences shall be made on the record or in writing and shall be based on one or more of the following considerations:

(1) The request of one or both of the Indian child’s parents, if they attest that they have reviewed the placement options, if any, that comply with the order of preference.

(2) The request
 of the child, if the child is of sufficient age and capacity to understand the decision that is being made.

(3) The presence of a sibling attachment that can be maintained only through a particular placement.

(4) The extraordinary physical, mental, or emotional needs of the Indian child, including specialized treatment services that may be unavailable in the community where families who meet the placement preferences live.

(5) The unavailability of a suitable placement after a determination by the court that a diligent search was conducted. For purposes of this paragraph, the standard for determining whether a placement is unavailable shall conform to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian community in which the Indian child’s parent or extended family resides or with which the Indian child’s
 parent or extended family members maintain social and cultural ties.

(k) A placement shall not depart from the preferences based on the socioeconomic status of any placement relative to another placement.

(l) A placement shall not depart from the preferences based solely on ordinary bonding or attachment that flowed from time spent in a nonpreferred placement that was made in violation of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(m) A record of each foster care placement or adoptive placement of an Indian child shall be maintained in perpetuity by the State Department of Social Services. The record shall document the active efforts to comply with the applicable order of preference specified in this section, and shall be made available within 14 days of a request by the child’s
 tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 187.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

361.4.

(a) Prior to making the emergency placement of a child pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 309 or Section 361.45, the county welfare department shall do all of the following:

(1) Conduct an in-home inspection to assess the safety of the home and the ability of the relative or nonrelative extended family member to care for the child’s needs.

(2) Cause a state-level criminal records check to be conducted by an appropriate government agency through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) pursuant to Section 16504.5 for all of the following:

(A) All persons over 18 years of age living in the home of the relative or nonrelative extended family member seeking emergency placement of the child, excluding any person who is a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(B) At the discretion of the county welfare department, any other person over 18 years of age known to the department to be regularly present in the home, other than professionals providing professional services to the child.

(C) At the discretion of the county welfare department, any person over 14 years of age living in the home who the department believes may have a criminal record. This subparagraph shall not apply to a child under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(3) Conduct a check of allegations of prior child abuse or neglect concerning the relative or nonrelative extended family member and other adults in the home.

(b) (1) If CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) indicates that the person has no criminal record, the child may be placed in the home on an emergency basis.

(2) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (B) or (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the child shall not be placed in the home unless a criminal record exemption has been granted using the exemption criteria specified in paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a child may be placed on an emergency basis if the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense not described in subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, pending a criminal record exemption decision based on live scan fingerprint results if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The conviction does not involve an offense against a child.

(B) The deputy director or director of the county welfare department, or their designee, determines that the
 placement is in the best interests of the child.

(C) No party to the case objects to the placement.

(4) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) indicates that the person has been arrested for any offense described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the child shall not be placed on an emergency basis in the home until the investigation required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code has been completed and the deputy director or director of the county welfare department, or their designee, and the court have considered the investigation results when determining whether the placement is in the best interests of the child.

(5) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the child shall not be placed in the home on an emergency basis.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (5), or the placement recommendation of the county placing agency, the court may authorize the placement of a child on an emergency basis in the home of a relative, regardless of the status of any criminal record exemption or resource family approval, if the court finds that the placement does not pose a risk to the health and safety of the child.

(c) Within 10 calendar days
 following the criminal records check conducted through the CLETS or 5 business days of making the emergency placement, whichever is sooner, the social worker shall ensure that a fingerprint clearance check of the relative or nonrelative extended family member and any other person whose criminal record was obtained pursuant to this section is initiated through the Department of Justice to ensure the accuracy of the criminal records check conducted through the CLETS and ensure criminal record clearance of the relative or nonrelative extended family member and all adults in the home pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 16519.5 and any associated written directives or regulations.

(d) An identification card from a foreign consulate or foreign passport shall be considered a valid form of identification for conducting a criminal records check pursuant to this section.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a federally recognized tribe or tribal organization, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 10553.12, is authorized, but not required, to approve homes for the purpose of the emergency placement of an Indian child as defined in Section 224.1, if the federally recognized tribe or tribal organization provides written confirmation to the county agency that all steps required under subdivisions (a) and (b) have been completed. An emergency placement for an Indian child
 approved by a federally recognized tribe or tribal organization shall be eligible for the same funding afforded any other emergency placement approved by a county agency, including, but not limited to, funding under Sections 11402, 11461.3, and 11461.36.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 18.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

361.45.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, when the sudden unavailability of a foster caregiver requires a change in placement for a child who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, if a relative, as defined in Section 319, or a nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7, is available and requests temporary placement of the child, the county welfare department shall initiate an assessment of the relative’s or nonrelative extended family member’s suitability pursuant to Section 361.4.

(b) Upon completion of the assessment pursuant to Section 361.4, the child may be placed in the home on an emergency basis. Following the emergency
 placement of the child, the county welfare department shall require the relative or nonrelative extended family member to submit an application for approval as a resource family and initiate the home environment assessment no later than five business days after the placement. Thereafter, the county welfare department shall evaluate and approve or deny the home pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(c) (1) On and after January 1, 2012, if a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, is placed in the home of a relative or nonrelative extended family member, the home shall be approved using the same standards set forth in regulations as described in Section 1502.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) On or before July 1, 2012, the
 department, in consultation with representatives of the Legislature, the County Welfare Directors Association, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the California Youth Connection, the Judicial Council, former foster youth, child advocacy organizations, dependency counsel for children, juvenile justice advocacy organizations, foster caregiver organizations, labor organizations, and representatives of Indian tribes, shall revise regulations regarding health and safety standards for approving relative homes in which nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, of the juvenile court are placed under the responsibility of the county welfare or probation department, or an Indian tribe that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1.

(3) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department, in consultation with the stakeholders listed in paragraph (2), shall prepare for implementation of the applicable provisions of this section by publishing all-county letters or similar instructions from the department by October 1, 2011, to be effective January 1, 2012. Emergency regulations to implement this section may be adopted by the director in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The initial adoption of the emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those emergency regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency
 regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 50.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

361.49.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), regardless of their age, a child shall be deemed to have entered foster care on the earlier of the date of the jurisdictional hearing held pursuant to Section 356 or the date that is 60 days after the date on which the child was initially removed from the physical custody of their parent or guardian.

(b) (1) When the court orders the custody of a child to be retained by the parent or guardian at disposition, even if the child was initially detained, and then subsequently removes the child at disposition on a petition brought under Section 342 or 387, the child is deemed to have entered foster care on the earlier of the date of the jurisdictional hearing held pursuant to Section 342 or 387 or the date that is 60 days after the date the child was initially removed from the physical custody of their parent or guardian on a petition brought under Section 342 or 387.

(2) The disposition on a petition brought under Section 342 or 387 shall be considered the initial disposition for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 366.21.

(c) For the purpose of calculating the date of a continued permanency review hearing pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 366.21 or a subsequent permanency review hearing pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 366.22, the child shall be deemed to have been originally removed from the physical custody of their parent or guardian on the date they were taken into custody by the social worker based on a petition brought under Section 342 or 387.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 412, Sec. 1.   (AB 2664)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

361.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), or when the parent has voluntarily relinquished the child and the relinquishment has been filed with the State Department of Social Services, or upon the establishment of an order of guardianship pursuant to Section 360, or when a court adjudicates a petition under Section 329 to modify the court’s jurisdiction from delinquency jurisdiction to dependency jurisdiction pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 607.2 and the parents or guardian of the ward have had reunification services terminated under the delinquency jurisdiction, whenever a child is removed from a parent’s or guardian’s custody, the juvenile court shall order the social worker to provide child welfare
 services to the child and the child’s mother and statutorily presumed father or guardians. Upon a finding and declaration of paternity by the juvenile court or proof of a prior declaration of paternity by any court of competent jurisdiction, the juvenile court may order services for the child and the biological father, if the court determines that the services will benefit the child.

(1) Family reunification services, when provided, shall be provided as follows:

(A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (C), for a child who, on the date of initial removal from the physical custody of the child’s parent or guardian, was three years of age or older, court-ordered services shall be provided beginning with the dispositional hearing and ending 12 months after the date the child entered
 foster care as provided in Section 361.49, unless the child is returned to the home of the parent or guardian.

(B) For a child who, on the date of initial removal from the physical custody of the child’s parent or guardian, was under three years of age, court-ordered services shall be provided for a period of 6 months from the dispositional hearing as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 366.21, but no longer than 12 months from the date the child entered foster care, as provided in Section 361.49, unless the child is returned to the home of the parent or guardian.

(C) For the purpose of placing and maintaining a sibling group together in a permanent home should reunification efforts fail, for a child in a sibling group whose members were removed from parental custody at the
 same time, and in which one member of the sibling group was under three years of age on the date of initial removal from the physical custody of the child’s parent or guardian, court-ordered services for some or all of the sibling group may be limited as set forth in subparagraph (B). For the purposes of this paragraph, “a sibling group” shall mean two or more children who are related to each other as full or half siblings.

(2) Any motion to terminate court-ordered reunification services prior to the hearing set pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.21 for a child described by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), or prior to the hearing set pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 366.21 for a child described by subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1), shall be made pursuant to the requirements set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 388. A
 motion to terminate court-ordered reunification services shall not be required at the hearing set pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 366.21 if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence one of the following:

(A) That the child was removed initially under subdivision (g) of Section 300 and the whereabouts of the parent are still unknown.

(B) That the parent has failed to contact and visit the child.

(C) That the parent has been convicted of a felony indicating parental unfitness.
